Hawaii statutes.
§704-406 Effect of finding of unfitness to
proceed and regained fitness to proceed. (1) If the court determines
that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the proceeding against the
defendant shall be suspended, except as provided in section 704-407, and the
court shall commit the defendant to the custody of the director of health to be
placed in an appropriate institution for detention, care, and treatment;
provided that the commitment shall be limited in certain cases as follows:

(a) When the defendant is charged with a petty
misdemeanor not involving violence or attempted violence, the commitment shall
be limited to no longer than sixty days from the date the court determines the
defendant lacks fitness to proceed; and

(b) When the defendant is charged with a misdemeanor
not involving violence or attempted violence, the commitment shall be limited
to no longer than one hundred twenty days from the date the court determines
the defendant lacks fitness to proceed.

If the court is satisfied that the defendant may be
released on conditions without danger to the defendant or to another or risk of
substantial danger to property of others, the court shall order the defendant's
release, which shall continue at the discretion of the court, on conditions the
court determines necessary; provided that the release on conditions of a
defendant charged with a petty misdemeanor not involving violence or attempted
violence shall continue for no longer than sixty days, and the release on
conditions of a defendant charged with a misdemeanor not involving violence or
attempted violence shall continue for no longer than one hundred twenty days.
A copy of all reports filed pursuant to section 704-404 shall be attached to
the order of commitment or order of release on conditions that is provided to the department of health. When
the defendant is committed to the custody of the director of health for
detention, care, and treatment, the county police departments shall provide to
the director of health and the defendant copies of all police reports from
cases filed against the defendant that have been adjudicated by the acceptance
of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, a finding of guilt, acquittal,
acquittal pursuant to section 704-400, or by the entry of a plea of guilty or
nolo contendere made pursuant to chapter 853; provided that the disclosure to
the director of health and the defendant does not frustrate a legitimate
function of the county police departments; provided further that expunged
records, records of or pertaining to any adjudication or disposition rendered
in the case of a juvenile, or records containing data from the United States
National Crime Information Center shall not be provided. The county police
departments shall segregate or sanitize from the police reports information
that would result in the likely or actual identification of individuals who
furnished information in connection with the investigation or who were of
investigatory interest. No further disclosure of records shall be made except
as provided by law.

(2) When the defendant is released on
conditions after a finding of unfitness to proceed, the department of health
shall establish and monitor a fitness restoration program consistent with
conditions set by the court order of release, and shall inform the prosecuting
attorney of the county that charged the defendant of the program and report the
defendant's compliance therewith.

(3) When the court, on its own motion or upon
the application of the director of health, the prosecuting attorney, or the
defendant, has reason to believe that the defendant has regained fitness to
proceed, for a defendant charged with the offense of murder in the first or
second degree, attempted murder in the first or second degree, or a class A
felony, the court shall appoint three qualified examiners and may appoint in
all other cases one qualified examiner, to examine and report upon the physical
and mental condition of the defendant. In cases in which the defendant has
been charged with murder in the first or second degree, attempted murder in the
first or second degree, or a class A felony, the court shall appoint as
examiners at least one psychiatrist and at least one licensed psychologist.
The third examiner may be a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or qualified
physician. One of the three examiners shall be a psychiatrist or licensed
psychologist designated by the director of health from within the department of
health. In all other cases, the one qualified examiner shall be a psychiatrist
or licensed psychologist designated by the director of health from within the
department of health. The court, in appropriate circumstances, may appoint an
additional examiner or examiners. All examiners shall be appointed from a list
of certified examiners as determined by the department of health. After a
hearing, if a hearing is requested, if the court determines that the defendant
has regained fitness to proceed, the penal proceeding shall be resumed and the
defendant shall no longer be committed to the custody of the director of
health. In cases where a defendant is charged with the offense of murder in
the first or second degree, attempted murder in the first or second degree, or
a class A felony, upon the request of the prosecuting attorney or the defendant,
and in consideration of information provided by the defendant's clinical team,
the court may order that the defendant remain in the custody of the director of
health, for good cause shown, subject to bail or until a judgment on the
verdict or a finding of guilt after a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.
Thereafter, the court may consider a request from the director of health to
rescind its order maintaining the defendant in the director's custody, for good
cause shown. As used in this section, the term "qualified physician"
means a physician qualified by the court for the specific evaluation ordered.
If, however, the court is of the view that so much time has elapsed since the
commitment or release on conditions of the defendant that it would be unjust to
resume the proceeding, the court may dismiss the charge and:

(a) Order the defendant to be discharged;

(b) Subject to section 334-60.2 regarding
involuntary hospitalization criteria, order the defendant to be committed to
the custody of the director of health to be placed in an appropriate
institution for detention, care, and treatment; or

(c) Subject to section 334-121 regarding assisted
community treatment criteria, order the defendant to be released on conditions
the court determines necessary.

(4) An examination for regained fitness to
proceed performed under this section may employ any method that is accepted by
the professions of medicine or psychology for the examination of those alleged
to be affected by a physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect, and shall
include a review of records where the defendant, while under the custody of the
director of health, was placed; provided that each examiner shall form and
render an opinion on the defendant's regained fitness to proceed independently from
the other examiners and the examiners, upon approval of the court, may secure
the services of clinical psychologists and other medical or paramedical
specialists to assist in the examination.

(5) The report of the examination for regained
fitness to proceed shall include the following:

(a) A description of the nature of the examination;

(b) An opinion as to the defendant's capacity to
understand the proceedings against the defendant and to assist in the
defendant's own defense; and

(c) Where more than one examiner is appointed, a
statement that the opinion rendered was arrived at independently of any other
examiner, unless there is a showing to the court of a clear need for
communication between or among the examiners for clarification. A description
of the communication shall be included in the report. After all reports are
submitted to the court, examiners may confer without restriction.

(6) All other procedures as set out in section
704-404(6) through (11) shall be followed for the completion of the report of
the examination for regained fitness to proceed performed under this section.

(7) If a defendant committed to the custody of
the director of health for a limited period pursuant to subsection (1) is not
found fit to proceed prior to the expiration of the commitment, the charge for
which the defendant was committed for a limited period shall be dismissed.
Upon dismissal of the charge, the defendant shall be released from custody
unless the defendant is subject to prosecution for other charges or subject to
section 334-60.2 regarding involuntary hospitalization criteria, in which case
the court shall order the defendant's commitment to the custody of the director
of health to be placed in an appropriate institution for detention, care, and
treatment. Within a reasonable time following any other commitment under
subsection (1), the director of health shall report to the court on whether the
defendant presents a substantial likelihood of becoming fit to proceed in the
future. The court, in addition, may appoint a panel of three qualified
examiners in felony cases or one qualified examiner in nonfelony cases to make
a report. If, following the report, the court determines that the defendant
probably will remain unfit to proceed, the court may dismiss the charge and:

(a) Release the defendant; or

(b) Subject to section 334-60.2 regarding
involuntary hospitalization criteria, order the defendant to be committed to
the custody of the director of health to be placed in an appropriate institution
for detention, care, and treatment.

(8) If a defendant released on conditions for
a limited period pursuant to subsection (1) is not found fit to proceed prior
to the expiration of the release on conditions order, the charge for which the
defendant was released on conditions for a limited period shall be dismissed.
Upon dismissal of the charge, the defendant shall be discharged from the
release on conditions unless the defendant is subject to prosecution for other
charges or subject to section 334-60.2 regarding involuntary hospitalization
criteria, in which case the court shall order the defendant's commitment to the
custody of the director of health to be placed in an appropriate institution
for detention, care, and treatment. Within a reasonable time following any
other release on conditions under subsection (1), the court shall appoint a
panel of three qualified examiners in felony cases or one qualified examiner in
nonfelony cases to report to the court on whether the defendant presents a
substantial likelihood of becoming fit to proceed in the future. If, following
the report, the court determines that the defendant probably will remain unfit
to proceed, the court may dismiss the charge and:

(a) Release the defendant; or

(b) Subject to section 334-60.2 regarding
involuntary hospitalization criteria, order the defendant to be committed to
the custody of the director of health to be placed in an appropriate
institution for detention, care, and treatment. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L
1986, c 314, §7; am L 1993, c 87, §1; am L 1997, c 306, §2; am L 2006, c 230,
§7; am L 2008, c 99, §2; am L 2011, c 53, §2 and c 112, §2; am L 2016, c 198,
§4 and c 231, §6]

COMMENTARY ON §704-406

Subsection (1) provides that following a determination of the
defendant's unfitness to be proceeded against, the defendant shall be committed
to the custody of the director of health or placed on conditional release for
the duration of the defendant's unfitness.

The commitment or conditional release of the unfit defendant does
not terminate until a determination by the court, after a hearing if one is
requested, that the defendant is fit to be proceeded against. Upon such a
determination, the penal proceedings resume unless the court finds that such
resumption would be unjust. This section is designed to allow no hiatus in the
procedure.

The Code, in its treatment of a defendant committed because
of unfitness to proceed, conforms to the present Hawaii law which insures that
a defendant so committed will remain in the custody of the director of health
until the defendant has regained fitness.[1] Previous Hawaii law had no
provision for conditional release of unfit defendants.

The second sentence of subsection (2) follows the suggestion
of the Model Penal Code[2] and permits "the court to dismiss the
prosecution if because of lapse of time it would be unjust to continue."[3]
Under the prior law the power to dismiss the prosecution was vested in the
prosecutor's discretion to enter a nolle prosequi. The Code accepts the position
that

there is value ... in vesting such a
power in the Court, to be exercised either where because of the lapse of time a
defendant is unable to produce certain witnesses or other evidence once
available which is essential to his defense, or where because of the length of
the intervening period which he has spent in a mental institution subsequent to
the alleged wrongful conduct it seems unjust to subject him to trial and
punishment.[4]

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §704-406

Act 314, Session Laws 1986, added subsection (3), which
implements the holding in State v. Raitz, 63 Haw. 64 (1980). In Raitz, the
court held that when a defendant is unlikely to become fit to proceed, due
process requires that: (1) following commitment, there should be a timely
determination of the likelihood of the defendant regaining fitness; and (2) if
the court determines that the defendant will probably remain unfit, the
defendant should be released or civilly committed. Conference Committee Report
No. 51-86.

Act 87, Session Laws 1993, amended this section to require
the court to appoint a panel of three qualified examiners to report on whether
a defendant who has been conditionally released presents a substantial
likelihood of becoming fit to proceed in the future. If the court determines
that the defendant probably will remain unfit to proceed, it may dismiss the
charge against the defendant or subject the defendant to involuntary civil
commitment procedures. In addition, this Act allows the court, following the
commitment of a defendant, to appoint a panel of three qualified examiners to
report on the defendant's likelihood of becoming fit to proceed in the future.
House Standing Committee Report No. 185, Senate Standing Committee Report Nos.
1061 and 1263.

Act 306, Session Laws 1997, amended subsections (3) and (4)
to allow mental health examinations to be conducted by one rather than three
examiners in nonfelony cases, and to require three examiners in felony cases.
The amendment streamlines the process for committing and releasing mentally
incompetent defendants. Conference Committee Report No. 64.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, amended this section to, among
other things, clarify that when a defendant is found to be affected by a
physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect and therefore remains unfit to
proceed, the defendant may be committed to the custody of the director of
health for placement in an appropriate institution, but only subject to the law
governing involuntary civil commitment. House Standing Committee Report No.
665-06.

Act 99, Session Laws 2008, amended subsection (1) by
requiring the county police departments to provide to the director of health
and a defendant who is committed to the custody of the director, copies of
certain police reports regarding that defendant. Act 99 expedited the records
disclosure process for clinical evaluation purposes while protecting a
patient's right of privacy. Conference Committee Report No. 161-08.

Act 53, Session Laws 2011, established a maximum time frame
for the mental health commitment or conditional release of a defendant found
unfit to proceed for trial. The Act limited the time of commitment or
conditional release to a maximum of: (1) sixty days for persons charged with
petty misdemeanors and (2) one hundred twenty days for persons charged with
misdemeanors, where the petty misdemeanor or misdemeanor did not involve
violence or attempted violence. Act 53 also required the dismissal of charges
for defendants committed or placed on conditional release who are not found fit
to proceed prior to the expiration of the commitment or conditional release
unless certain elements are met.

The legislature found that when a defendant lacks fitness to
proceed, criminal proceedings are suspended, and the defendant is committed to
the director of health to be placed in an appropriate institution for
detention, care, and treatment. The commitment to the director of health can
be indefinite if the defendant continues to be found unfit to proceed, and the
defendant may be held by the director of health for a period that is longer
than the period of incarceration that the defendant would have received if the
defendant had been sentenced to the maximum incarceration period allowed by
law. House Standing Committee Report No. 700, Senate Standing Committee Report
No. 1125.

Act 112, Session Laws 2011, amended this section by requiring
the department of health to establish and monitor a fitness restoration program
consistent with the conditions set by a court order of release when a defendant
is released on conditions after a finding of unfitness to proceed; and to
inform the prosecuting attorney of the county that charged the defendant of the
fitness restoration program and report the defendant's compliance with the
program. Act 112 provided a formal structure and mechanism to address
community safety and monitoring concerns for persons found unfit to proceed and
released on conditions. Conference Committee Report No. 79, Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 1216, House Standing Committee Report No. 861.

Act 198, Session Laws 2016, amended this section by
specifying procedures after a finding of unfitness to proceed and regained
fitness to proceed. The legislature found that it is in the best interest of
the defendants for the examination process to proceed in a timely, expedient
manner by codifying procedures for appointing examiners for reevaluation of
fitness. Conference Committee Report No. 153-16.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended this section to implement
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Law Journals and Reviews

Comments and Questions About Mental Health Law in Hawaii. 13
HBJ, no. 4, at 3 (1978).

Risky Business: Assessing Dangerousness in Hawai‘i. 24 UH
L. Rev. 63 (2001).

Case Notes

Where defendant is unfit to proceed, a motion for judgment of
acquittal by reason of mental irresponsibility under §704-408 will be
deferred. 61 H. 313, 602 P.2d 944 (1979).

The phrase authorizing commitment "for so long as ... unfitness
shall endure" is qualified by subsection (2); statute not constitutionally
infirm. 63 H. 64, 621 P.2d 352 (1980).

Does not apply to postacquittal proceedings. 71 H. 198, 787
P.2d 221 (1990).

A court order authorizing the involuntary administration of
antipsychotic drugs is included within the authority vested by this section.
91 H. 319, 984 P.2d 78 (1999).

__________

§704-406 Commentary:

1. H.R.S. §334-76.

2. M.P.C. §4.06.

3. M.P.C. Tentative Draft No. 4, comments at 197 (1955).

4. Id. at 197-98.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next